District of Columbia statutes.
24-263.01

Telephone charges in penal or correctional institutions.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other District of Columbia law, no telephone service provider shall charge a customer a rate for operator-assisted calls made from a penal or correctional institution in the District of Columbia in excess of the maximum rate determined by the Public Service Commission of the District of Columbia.

(b)

No penal or correctional institution in the District of Columbia shall charge a surcharge, commission, or other financial imposition that is in addition to legally established rates for local or long-distance telephone service.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-280, § 2, 48 DCR 1885

History